Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2142XS (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 114 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 481A.41 Baiting of deer. 1 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 a. âBaited areaâ means any area where feed is placed, 4 exposed, deposited, distributed, or scattered with the intent 5 to lure, attract, or entice wildlife to a specific location. 6 b. (1) âFeedâ means any of the following materials that 7 are capable of luring, attracting, or enticing wildlife to a 8 specific location: 9 (a) Grain, fruit, vegetables, nuts, hay, salt, mineral 10 blocks, or any other natural food materials. 11 (b) Commercial products containing natural food materials. 12 (c) By-products of materials listed in subparagraph 13 division (a) or (b). 14 (2) âFeedâ does not include any of the following: 15 (a) Food placed during normal agricultural activities 16 including but not limited to feed placed for livestock that are 17 present and are actively consuming the feed on a regular basis. 18 (b) Incidental feeding of wildlife within an active 19 livestock operation. 20 (c) Crops planted and left standing as food plots for 21 wildlife. 22 (d) Grain or other feed scattered or distributed as a result 23 of normal agricultural, gardening, soil stabilization, or 24 logging practices. 25 (e) Vegetation or other feed that is naturally deposited in 26 an area. 27 2. A person shall not hunt, take, or attempt to take deer 28 on or in a baited area. 29 3. A person shall not place, expose, deposit, distribute, 30 or scatter feed on a baited area on any private or public 31 property, or knowingly allow another person to place, expose, 32 deposit, distribute, or scatter feed on a baited area on 33 private property under the personâs ownership or lease in 34 the state unless all feed is removed from the baited area at 35 -1- LSB 2142XS (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 4 S.F. 114 least ten days prior to the opening day of the first fall deer 1 hunting season. An area remains a baited area for ten days 2 following complete removal of all feed from the area, except 3 for salt, minerals, or any other feed that will dissolve and 4 leach into the soil, in which case the area shall be considered 5 a permanently baited area until such time as all contaminated 6 soil is removed or until there is no longer evidence that deer 7 are artificially attracted to or are accessing the site. A 8 person shall not hunt, take, or attempt to take deer within two 9 hundred yards of a permanently baited area until such time as 10 all contaminated soil is removed from the area or until there 11 is no evidence that deer are artificially attracted to or are 12 accessing the area. 13 4. If salt, minerals, or any other feed that will dissolve 14 and leach into the soil is placed in an area for agricultural 15 purposes, that area shall not be considered a baited area or a 16 permanently baited area. 17 5. A person shall not establish a baited area or place, 18 expose, deposit, distribute, or scatter feed in an area with 19 the intent to prevent or disrupt the hunting activities of 20 another person. A violation of this subsection constitutes a 21 violation of section 481A.125. 22